District of Columbia statutes.
15-912

Supplementary general principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant, and the laws relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating causes supplement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 101, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(e), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-912.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105 substituted “this chapter” for “this act” in both places.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “this chapter” for “this subchapter”.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 13 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.